Connecticut, session 2026, HB05185.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
surcharge on the net gain from the sale or exchange of capital assets and
LCO No. 930 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5185
the income from dividends, for a taxpayer whose Connecticut adjusted
gross income is equal to or greater than the threshold amount specified
in section 12-700 of the general statutes for imposition of the highest
marginal rate on such taxpayer.